src/ateq-kal-morph.txt
LEXICON Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutiga	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaa	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutini	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCuterput	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>tarput	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutersi	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>tarsi	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaat	K ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>taat	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutertik	K ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>tartik	K ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCup	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutima	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutivit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimi	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitta	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>tatta	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissi	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>tassi	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>taata	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>tamik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>taannut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnit	K ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>taannit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnit	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>taanni	LokVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>taminni	LokVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimisut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsitut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissitut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>tassitut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaattut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>taattut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimittut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>tamittut	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>taannik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnik	K ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>tassigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>taatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>tamikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ

LEXICON Zateq_oqsZ
    Zateq_oqsZ-suf ;      !SUB
LEXICON Zateq_oqsZ-suf    !SUB
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+Attr: # ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:i	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%>iutiga	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%>iutit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaa	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Sg:%>iutini	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>iuterput	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>ertarput	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>iutersi	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>ertarsi	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaat	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaat	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>iutertik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>ertartik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Sg:%>iutima	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Sg:%>iutivit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaata	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Sg:%>iutimi	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitta	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatta	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissi	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassi	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaata	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaata	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>iutimik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>ertamik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Sg:%>iutinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Sg:%>iutinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaanut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Sg:%>iutiminut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassinnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaannut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaannut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>iutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>ertaminnut	TrmVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>iutinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>iutinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaanit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>iutiminit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassinnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaannit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaannit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>iutiminnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>ertaminnit	AblVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>iutinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>iutinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaaniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>iutiminiit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassinniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaanniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaanniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>iutiminniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>ertaminniit	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Sg:%>iutinni	LokVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Sg:%>iutinni	LokVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Sg:%>iutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaanni	LokVb ;
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaanni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>iutiminni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>ertaminni	LokVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Sg:%>iutittut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Sg:%>iutittut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaatut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Sg:%>iutimisut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsitut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsitut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissitut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassitut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaattut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaattut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>iutimittut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>ertamittut	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Sg:%>iutinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Sg:%>iutinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaanik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Sg:%>iutiminik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>itassinnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaannik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaannik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>iutiminnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>ertaminnik	K ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Sg:%>iutikkut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Sg:%>iutikkut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaagut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>iutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Sg:%>iutimigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>iutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>ertatsigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>iutissigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>ertassigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>iutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>ertaatigut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>iutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>ertamikkut	ViaVb ; !Zateq_oqsZ






LEXICON Z1geoSZmorf !Igaliku og Narsaq
+LIAR+nv:%>%TRUNCliar	IV ;
+MIU:%>miu	Z1Zmorf ;
+MIUQ:%>mioq	Z1Zmorf ;
+U:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
		Z1geoSZ ;
